Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2061.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 9, to read: CHAPTER 9 PATIENTS' RIGHTS ARTICLE 1. PATIENTS' RIGHTS START_STATUTE1-901. Health professionals; patients; rights; definitions A. If a Patient receives health care services in this state, the patient has the right to receive health care services from a health professional who abides by the following principles: 1. To act only in the patient's best interest. 2. To DO NO harm. 3. To ensure that informed consent is received for each medical decision, proposed diagnostic or therapeutic procedure or course of action, except in an emergency. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Health professional" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3201. 2. "Patient" MEANS a human being, including an unborn child. 3. "Unborn child" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2151. END_STATUTE